Title
Review for Crash (1996)
Number of Reviews
23

Author
Martyn C Winkler
        David Cronenbergs newest creation, the intriguingly dark CRASH, is
probably one of the most controversial films in today's cinemas. Until its 
release nationwide Friday, March 21, it was uncertain if the film would be
released at all in the United States, due to Ted Turner, the owner of Fine
Line Cinema. Turner has repeatedly stated that he hates the film and
thinks it is nothing more than pornography. Many people agree fervently
with his point of view. On the opposing side, however, many greatly admire
CRASH, along with countless respected film critics and movie buffs. And
while it has been banned in several countries internationally, it has won
an impromptu invented prize at the prestigious Cannes Film Festival for
"Originality, daring and audacity". It seems that you either love this 
movie, or hate it. This controversy is by itself reason enough to go see
CRASH. Decide for yourself if you will join a boycott group to save our
society from this morally corrupting film, or join the CRASH fan club to
defend the right to make and view artistic trash...eh...Crash.
        For those of you who still need some more persuasion to pay six
dollars for this film, I will try to review it as objectively as possible
(but will probably end up defending it anyway).
        In one sentence the plot of CRASH seems very crude: people get
their sexual kicks from car-crashes. However, the film is not about the
plot. It is about our modern detached society, about destructive
fetishism. More about that later.
        When the film opens, after a terrific credit-sequence, we meet a
couple, James Ballard (named after the writer of CRASH; played by James
Spader) and his wife Catherine (Deborah Unger). Both are engaged in pure
physical sex...with someone else. Catherine is spread over the cold
metallic hood of a small aircraft, James over his own desk. When the two
meet afterwards, they discuss their experiences in a seemingly
matter-of-fact way and appear not to be sexually satisfied at all.
        That night James is driving back to his work. One distracted
glance later he finds himself colliding with another car, killing the
driver, but leaving the passenger alive. It is Dr. Helen Remington (Holly
Hunter). Soon after he is released from hospital, Helen introduces James
to an obscure group of people whose lives evolve solely around
car-crashes. Consequently, all of them are scarred extensively and some
even have intricate prostheses. The leader of this group, Vaughan (Elias
Koteas), who specializes in recreating celebrity car-crashes (like James
Deans fatal collision), explains what the crashes mean to him: "It is
sexual liberation." To put it plainly, it is the fetish of this group. It
provides their necessary sexual pleasure. And a deadly crash would be the
absolute peak of that pleasure.
        Frankly, this plot-outline does resemble that of a shallow
porn-flick. It is true as well, that after every crash there are numerous
sexually explicit scenes; not quite as shocking and perverse as some want
us to believe, however. The question then arises: How does CRASH differ
from DEEP THROAT?
        Director David Cronenberg has always been interested in artistic
gore. His remake of THE FLY involved gruesome devouring of limbs; in DEAD
RINGERS Jeremy Irons operates on his twin brother using gynecological
instruments, killing him. What makes his films artistically successful is
his style and form. Cronenberg always balances on the edge of acceptable
and manages never to go over the top. His mis-en-scene transforms the
ugliest scene into an intriguing portrait. His use of light and camera
(shadows are very important) and his direction of the actors (adding to
them a sense of detachment and aloofness) guarantees subtlety to sodomy,
beauty to blood.
        For CRASH in particular, Cronenberg has managed to pull this off
for sex rather than violence. In portraying destructive sexual fetishism,
he has chosen car-crashes as the instruments of pleasure. Why cars?
Perhaps because in the modern world cars are indeed a symbol for our
sexuality. The bigger the car, the more successful and desirable we are.
Need I go into the allegory of why everybody would rather have a shiny red
convertible over a shabby brown pick-up truck?
        Maybe another reason to specifically use car-crashes is that they
do not arouse anybody sexually, except the characters in the film. I
cannot imagine that anyone could derive sexual pleasure from a collision
with another car. Sure, it can be exhilarating (like the fantastically
thrilling sequences on the highway), but certainly not orgasmic; not in
the real world anyway. Cronenberg forces the audience to view the scenes
with a certain detachment and focuses the attention on the destructive
aspect of fetishism. He forces the viewer to think by using a virtually
non-desirable fetish.
        CRASH is clearly not a pornographic exploitation movie. It is too
cold, too mechanic for that. Rather, it is a dark view on modern society
and its destructive (sexual) forces. The seething critics of this film
have a lot in common with those of THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT; they oppose
the film for the wrong reasons. LARRY FLYNT is not about glorifying the
founder of Hustler magazine; it is not even about the sex-industry. It is
about a groundbreaking trial that helped establish and strengthen a little
notion called 'freedom of speech'. CRASH is not about sex or pornography
and it certainly does not glorify it. If only the protesters would
actually know what they are protesting against (i.e., go see the film),
they would realize their ignorance.
        When I saw this film in the cinema, my fellow audience members
mainly consisted of older men. I suspect they did not get what they came
for. Neither will any (premature) critics of CRASH.

Author
Christopher Null
     Kinky sex?  Intentional car wrecks?  Extreme underground
perversion?  A year and a half of fuss and controversy for this?  You
betcha!
     CRASH is one of the more disturbing movies I've seen in my
lifetime, and although I enjoyed it on an aesthetic level, I find it
difficult to recommend to the masses, and I think you'll see why in a
minute.
     David Cronenberg's story of a cadre of fetishists who get off on
car wrecks and suck in the not-so-innocent-themselves Ballard family
(James Spader and Deborah Unger) is an exercise in extremism.  Powerful
performances by all the leads (especially Holly Hunter and Elias Koteas
as big-time fetishists), excellent scoring, and masterful visuals make
CRASH a tricky little picture.  A little eye-popping, a little
nauseating, it's easy to get sucked into Cronenberg's spell.
     Then again, this is a movie about sex and car crashes, for God's
sake!  Where Cronenberg fails in his attempt to shock us is in his
trying much too hard to make us identify with these freaks and their
freakishness.  When you let your disbelief creep in just a little bit,
you start to ask yourself if it's even remotely reasonable to be aroused
by a car crash.  I just don't think so.
     CRASH gets progressively more and more disturbing as it gets more
and more ridiculous.  The ending is predictable, yet oddly understated.
     Sure, it's pretty silly when you sit down and think about it, but I
have to hand it to Cronie for trying.  I know I buckled my seatbelt on
the way home from the theater.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Author
Deepak Singh
Plot Summary: James Ballard (played by James Spader) and his partner Catherine 
(played by Deborah Unger) have numerous sexual liaisons with each other and 
with other people.  Driving home one night, James is involved in a car 
accident with Dr. Helen Remington (played by Holly Hunter).  Both have 
sustained major injuries and they are drawn together by the activities of 
Vaughan (played by Elias Koteas), a photographer who delights in capturing the 
essence, both spiritually and sexually, of renowned car crashes by re-enacting 
them or staging them.  But how long can this deadly lifestyle last?
Watching CRASH was quite a cinematic experience.  As far as I know, it was 
shown in only one Melbourne cinema (the Lumiere) and the theatre I saw it in 
could probably house a hundred people maximum.  Reading press clippings about 
mass walkouts in Cannes and banishment from movie screens in South Australia 
and Western Australia added to the intrigue.  The movie itself contains very 
extreme and disturbing scenes but largely insulated by its incendiary world, 
has a surrealistic look and feel.  Yet, I came out of CRASH feeling rather 
uneasy and too dissatisfied for my liking.
The main reason for this is that too much of CRASH is images.  While they are 
filmed beautifully and expertly, the large absence of a plot structure fails 
to deliver on the power these images could have provoked.  While the high 
prevalence of sex scenes may cater for the horndogs of the audience, there 
isn't enough meat in the story to justify their multitude and to satisfy the 
more cerebral among us.
The strength of CRASH was the effective portrayal of the dark and forbidding 
world the characters inhabit.  Most scenes take place at night with the 
daytime scenes clouded with atmospheric grime from factors such as the heavy 
traffic, among the few external intrusions in this insular lifestyle.  Music 
plays a subtly important role here, its occasional infusion is used for the 
more critical scenes. 
CRASH is quite a mixed bag.  It's images and cinematography are second-to-none 
and cast a uniquely nightmarish and decadent light on one of society's more 
ordinary pastimes.  However, the rather thin plot provides no support to 
effectively convey the power of these images.  This especially renders many of 
the sex scenes superfluous and redundant.  While director David Cronenberg has 
the elements to weave a truly compelling and unique tale, the combined effort 
doesn't quite gel together properly.
A copy of this review will appear at my movie review page at
        http://www.labyrinth.net.au/~dvsin/Movies

Author
Steve Rhodes
     CRASH is an extremely well made but utterly preposterous show.  It
is so far out that it is off of any scale you can imagine.  Suffice it
to say that it pushes the limits of its NC-17 rating.  All of this
notwithstanding, the film is a taut thriller that keeps you on the edge
of your seat.
     The day before the press screening of CRASH, I saw a screening of
a film, KISSED, about necrophilia.  KISSED seems like REBECCA OF
SUNNYBROOK FARM in comparison with CRASH.
     CRASH's Canadian director, David Cronenberg, has a taste for films
on the edge.  Some of them have been critical and financial successes.
Perhaps his most widely acclaimed film was THE FLY, but I am also a fan
of THE DEAD ZONE and DEAD RINGERS.  Cronenberg's last film was the
controversial M. BUTTERFLY.
     Now, what if you team Cronenberg with a writer who is even farther
out?  Well, CRASH's script was adapted by Cronenberg from a semi-
autobiographical novel by J. G. Ballard.  Although you may know Ballard
from another semi-autobiographical novel of his, EMPIRE OF THE SUN, his
background is more in the science fiction realm.
     The press kit is a treasure trove of information on the author.
Ballard says that, "'Crash' is an autobiographical novel in the sense
that it is about my inner life, my imaginative life."  More telling is
the quote from a reader employed by his publisher, who, upon reading
"Crash," declared that, "This author is beyond psychiatric help.  Do
Not Publish!"
     Have you ever thought of car crashes as a mating dance for Homo
sapiens?  Well, Ballard did and that's only part of his amoral, sexual
fantasies in the film.
     James Spader, recreating a character with the same coldness as
Graham in SEX, LIES, AND VIDEOTAPE, plays James Ballard.  Ballard in
the film is a sometime film producer.  Most of the film he is either
engaged in sex or car crashes or both.  He and his wife Catherine
(Deborah Unger) make love in ways and in places you've probably never
thought of before.  (The film does not discriminate.  People young and
old, rich and poor, clean and dirty, male and female -- all have sex
with each other in various combinations.)  Unger is perfectly cast in
the role.  Her vacant eyes had me convinced that she was dead more than
once during the film.
     James has an accident early in the film when his car crashes head
on into another car.  The dead driver of the other car is thrown into
the front seat with James.  He exchanges stares with the passenger in
the other car, Dr. Helen Remington (Holly Hunter).  After James and
Helen get out of the hospital, they find that car crashes are the
ultimate sexual turn-on for them.  Second would be bodily disfiguration
caused by crashes.
     The car crashes and the sex scenes are quite graphic and
realistic.  Cronenberg delights in gratuitous violence.  And yet, the
filmmaking is intriguing despite its repugnant aspects.  Still, if you
or a close friend has ever been hurt in a car crash, I would avoid this
film like the plague since it will undoubtedly rekindle bad memories.
Those of us fortunate enough not to be in that position can perhaps
look upon the film a bit more dispassionately.  (When I entered the
parking garage before the picture I was almost hit from behind, and
when I left, I was almost hit in the front.  I am not making this up as
Dave Barry would say.)
     Just when you think you've met the weirdest group of characters
imaginable, stranger people still come on the scene.  Easily the most
deviant character of the lot is a fellow known as Vaughan (Elias
Koteas).  His specialty is recreating the great car crashes of history.
As he and two of his friends reenact the James Dean crash, one wonders
who will survive.  In the viewing stands, even James and Helen are
surprised by Vaughan's antics until, of course, they get turned on by
them.  Vaughan is something of a philosopher.  He tells us that, "The
car crash is a fertilizing rather than a destructive event."
     Perhaps the whole show can be summed up in the scene where the
whole crowd of car crash worshipers huddle around their television.
Looking like Super Bowl Sunday, these viewers are glued to the screen,
watching tapes of car crashes even if the narration is in German.  When
the VCR freezes during Helen's favorite crash, she acts like an addict
getting the shakes from trying to kick the habit.  (Also in their
clique is Rosanna Arquette playing a woman named Gabrielle whose legs
are bound in metal casts from her accident.)
     The cinematography by Peter Suschitzky is alternatively beautiful
and gory -- blending shadows, headlights, chrome, sex, and gashing
wounds.  The sets by Carol Spier are gritty and almost clinically
realistic.  The oppressive music by Howard Shore bristles with tension
from the twangy guitar strings.  The music could be administered to
prisoners of war in an attempt to crack them.
     When the half dozen critics left the press screening, each of us
found ourselves saying to the other, "Drive carefully."
     CRASH runs 1:40.  It is rated NC-17 for graphic violence, accident
carnage, full frontal nudity, explicit and aberrant sexual content,
drug usage, and the list goes on.  This show is not appropriate for
kids of any age.  As a thriller and a piece of filmmaking, CRASH is
quite impressive, but I could never bring myself to recommend this
exploitive film.  I give it **.
Opinions expressed are mine and not meant to reflect my employer's.

Author
Marty Cassady
AUTO-EROTICA (or, a new meaning to the term "sex drive")
Let's get a couple of things out of the way:
1. Cars are sexy. We've been told for decades by Madison Avenue (at 
least, those of us who are male have been told) that a hot car is a 
"chick magnet", and there's not a complete absence of truth in that. 
I used to have a white 1976 Camaro, and it was gorgeous. I washed it 
almost every day. A female friend once told me it was "an extension of 
my penis", and there wasn't a complete absence of truth in that statement, 
either.
2. Lots of us have had some sort of sexual experience in a car. If not 
intercourse, then at least heavy petting or hand-holding or just riding 
around with somebody you're really hot for. Vehicle interiors are very 
cozy, intimate places, and being in one with an attractive person is 
undeniably erotic.
Now: considering the above, and considering the increasingly bizarre 
practices people engage in nowadays to achieve sexual gratification, is 
it really that big a jump from the idea of cars being sexy to that of car 
crashes being sexy? Is it really that hard to imagine that out there, 
somewhere, is a group of people who have married that notion to the darker 
realm of sado-masochism, and who are irrepressiby aroused by not just 
viewing car wrecks, but actually participating in them?
Certainly not in the imaginative netherworld of Canadian filmmaker David 
Cronenberg, who for twenty years has explored the transformation of the 
human body into things mystical and/or horrific with movies like 
"Videodrom", "Scanners", "Dead Ringers", "The Fly" and "The Dead Zone." 
Only Cronenberg could possibly take on J.G. Ballard's 1973 cult novel 
about a clique of car-crash fetishists. Remember, this is the man who 
filmed the "unfilmable" novel "Naked Lunch", adding his own shadowy vision 
to William S. Burroughs' vaulting hallucinations. Cronenberg's "Crash" 
evokes utterly alien feelings. This film is a careening drive down a road 
you've never traveled (and may not want to again.) It's as bold a film as 
American audiences have ever seen; a film that won a special prize from 
the Cannes festival "for daring and audacity"; that has inspired 
controversy since even before its debut, and that fully deserves its NC17 
rating.
The protagonist of "Crash" is James Ballard (James Spader), an adult-film 
producer who is married to the icily beautiful and bored Catherine 
(Deborah Unger.) The Ballards' sex life is already unusual; they each 
engage in affairs and report back to one another while in their own bed. 
One day, James loses control of his car near the Toronto airport, and rams 
head-on into a vehicle carrying Dr. Helen Remington (Holly Hunter) and her 
husband, who is killed. James and Helen formally meet each other in the 
hospital, and James is introduced to Helen's new friend Vaughan (Elias 
Koteas.) Vaughan's face is scarred and he walks with a limp - all the 
result of his frightening hobby of staging car crashes for his own 
pleasure and that of his fellow fetishists (including his girlfriend, 
played by Rosanna Arquette in one of the more disturbing combinations of 
costume and makeup that we've seen in recent memory.)
James and Helen soon begin an affair, centered around their newly 
discovered, twisted passion for automobiles. Catherine, in turn, is 
fascinated by Vaughan, and her desire turns toward the dark places he 
explores. All four become totally obsessed, and are led into increasingly 
reckless and dangerous behavior in search of the ultimate experience. A 
warning to more "sensitive" viewers: if you are the slightest bit timid 
about onscreen sex, then "Crash" is not for you. The sex in this film is 
explicit and almost constant throughout, and features the principal 
characters in almost every possible combination. To show anything less 
would be to fail to do the story justice, for sex is what these people 
are about. It's what drives (no pun intended) them, and what makes them 
who they are.
Like most of Cronenberg's films, "Crash" is far more than the sum of its 
parts. The performances are uniformly restrained, even Koteas' turn as 
the squirrelly Vaughan. The tone is grayish and the lighting dim; there's 
not a ray of sunshine in the whole thing (nor should there be.) It's an 
astounding piece of work, in more ways than one, and, like it or not, 
probably Cronenberg's best. At the screening I attended, "Crash" 
generated as noticeable an audience  response as anything I've recently 
seen, ranging from nervous chatter and tittering to uneasy laughter, 
groans and outright shock. It's more than just a mind-blowing story of 
people pushing the limits of human experience: it's itself an experience, 
that seriously stretches the boundaries to (and beyond) which the film 
medium is willing to go. If you feel like stretching your own limits, 
then get behind the wheel and head out to see "Crash." Drive carefully, 
if that's what turns you on.
Marty's Official Recommendations (TM):
- Highly recommended to adventurous viewers and David Cronenberg fans
- Recommended with strong reservations to the general moviegoer
- Not recommended to those likely to be offended by onscreen sex
CRASH. From Fine Line Features. Directed by David Cronenberg. Starring 
James Spader, Holly Hunter, Deborah Unger, Elias Koteas, Rosanna Arquette. 
Written by David Cronenberg, based on the novel by J.G. Ballard. Running 
time: 100 minutes. Rated NC17 for language, car-crash violence and 
numerous explicit sex scenes.
This review copyright 1997 by Marty Cassady.
Mat redistribute freely in cyberspace if not altered.

Author
Michael J. Legeros
(Fine Line)
Directed by     David Cronenberg
Written by      David Cronenberg, from the novel by J.G. Ballard
Cast            James Spader, Holly Hunter, Elias Koteas, Deborah Kara
                Unger, Rosanna Arquette
MPAA Rating     "NC-17" (presumably for sex, gore, nudity, etc.)
Running Time    100 minutes.
Reviewed at     The Rialto, Raleigh, NC (21MAR97)
    CRASH is about a bunch of over-sexed Canucks who get their jollies
from colliding cars.  Yup, it's explicit.  Yup, it's vintage David
Cronenberg, with all those scars and wounds and reshaped flesh.  As a
study of sexual fetishes, though, the story needs at least *some* sem-
blance of a reality base.  (And, perhaps, an explanation of why there
are no such things as traffic cops in Canada.) We're thrown into a world
of weird people doing weird things and, without even a remote sense of
which way is up, it's nearly impossible to get oriented enough to get
involved.  Winner of a Special Jury Prize at last year's Cannes Film
Festival.
    CRASH was screened at the Rialto, in Raleigh.  We were greeted by
the sweet smell of sawdust, from the previous day's installation of a
brand-spanking-new screen.  And, oh, doesn't that Dolby Digital system
sound good on the trailer for SMILLA'S SENSE OF SNOW?
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Author
louis@travel-net.com (Louis)
David Cronenberg's "Crash" is about sex and crashing cars. There are
the "horror" elements to this movie: Cronenberg sometimes uses more of
a psycho-fright rather than exploiting  techno-monsters from
outer-space. When this kind of horror is done well, the results can be
truly frightening. Take, for example, "Dead Ringers": twin
gynecologists who have a mental breakdown that takes the form of a
regression through the past of medical practices performed on women.
The effectiveness of that film relies in part on the premise being
within the realm of possibility. "Crash" also takes on the same
ontological attitude toward presenting horror.
Crash wants to talk about technology and the transformation of the
human body. Of course, that's a pretty big subject. "Crash" tries to
narrow it down to changes created by car crashes. Cronenberg
emphasizes crashing. There are no car chases, no races, no quarter
mile drags, and no stunts worth speaking of. Mind you, the few stunts
in the film are well done, but fundamentally, this is not a car movie.
The characters in the movies really love car crashes, but nothing else
about car. As someone who appreciates a good car, I like a crash as
much as the next guy, but only in a contest situation where both the
drivers' skills and lives are on the line. But to like only the crash
part? Metal meets metal meets meat. There in lies the sex connection:
the big bad male Continental bumps the female Miata of the road and
lo, an accident. Crash, so let's fuck. Now, there's a premise for a
movie. It may seem strange, but it's certainly original. 
Crash gives us a few techno-deviated characters in the form of
metal-mutilated bodies: a heavily scared maniac who replicates James
Dean's death-crash as form of art, a machine-twisted female body that
has acquired a new object of eroticism via a fender- bender. And so
Rosanna Arquette wears leather sleeze-wear under chrome leg braces. I
guess the body takes a licking, but evolution keeps on ticking. It's
the kind of deviation one would expect after millions of years of
making love in the back seat of a car. A crash simply accelerates the
process. A face or a leg gets mangled; the car's stick shift ends up
in the passenger seat.
All this good stuff is explained in the movie by Cronenberg.  It's
just as well that he did, for otherwise one might take his movie to be
just another (well-done) soft core porno film. If you want to see
well-filmed erotica, this is the movie for you. Cronenberg does not
insist on an understanding of his bodies-meets-technology thesis for
someone to enjoy the film. For the viewer, what the characters mumble
during the sex scenes could take on the same importance as over-dubbed
moans, groans, and exclamations. I can well imagine a young couple
renting this movie on a Saturday night in order to get the romantic
blood flowing. That very same couple could ignore the "deeper" content
of the images. And why wouldn't they? Empty lives crash for the sake
of crashing, and sex without romance is empty. Who wants to be told
that their lives are empty? Cronenberg has something important to say
about our way of being, but he makes it far too easy to ignore it.
It's not easy to understand a car as a media extension when the
steering wheel is in the way of your taking off your pants.

Author
Vince Deehan
Written and Directed by David Cronenberg. Based on the book by J.G.
Ballard.
Cast: James Spader, Holly Hunter, Elias Koteas, Deborah Kara Unger and
Rosanna Arquette.
CRASH finally got released in the UK today, Friday June 6th 1997. It
is still banned by the London Council of Westminster but the 
distributors have managed to get some cinemas *just* on the outside 
of this boundary (namely the ABC Shaftesbury Ave for one, where I saw it),
to screen it. So people living near the West End don't have to trek
out into the suburbs to see it !  I saw it at the first screening of the day 
a t 12:40 and upon leaving the cinema I was not one bit surprised to see a 
film crew interviewing people as they left the cinema. I managed to creep past
them ! I wouldn't have known what to say !
The plot of the film, although the word plot seems hardly appropriate
giving the distinct lack of one, was showing the exploits of a group of 
individuals who get their sexual kicks from watching and being involved in 
car crashes.  I won't bother with trotting out the names of the characters 
or even try to distinguish them from each other because I found them all
deeply uninteresting and not really worthy of much close attention.
The only reasons to see this film are if you're interested in lots of
graphic sex scenes and want to see some awesome car crashes. I can't deny 
that some of the sex scenes were highly charged and very erotic (although 
I almost feel ashamed saying it !) but this is not what I go to the cinema 
to see, as a rule.  The best films have great dialogue, a good story
and believable characters.  CRASH had none of these things.
The car crash scenes were as explicit as the sex scenes and really
quite frightening. I certainly jumped out of my seat several times !  
The sheer force of some of the jolts was very well conveyed,
not least in one scene where they re-enact Jimmy Dean's car crash.  It
was terrifyingly real.  I hate driving, in fact I have a bit of a phobia 
about driving to the extent that I haven't driven a car for over
a year (I kid you not).  This film has only confirmed my fears of driving, 
or more specifically of crashing.  I'm not sure if this is a good thing 
or a bad thing !
The cast for CRASH is led by James Spader, Deborah Kara Unger, Elias Koteas
and Holly Hunter.  That's an impressive cast, but although they did their best
I'm sure , I still found all the characters hard to care about.  There was 
so little dialogue in the film, which made the characters seem very thin 
and it was impossible to understand their motivations.  How did these 
people become so twisted that a violent car crash seemed to be an essential
part of their sex lives ? The film doesn't even attempt to offer an
explanation. We are merely presented with these strange people and are shown 
in detail what they get up to, but the film offers no opinion of its own.  
It's all up to us to come to some sort of conclusion I guess.
The music by Howard Shore is one of the best things about the film.
It's mostly led by a screechy guitar motif that crops up throughout the 
film, and gives CRASH an appropriately jarring background sound
The opening titles were also great. All the names of the cast and crew
were shown coming towards the viewer and were composed of twisted chrome 
letters. Very classy, I thought.
The thing is, good music and good titles does not in itself make a good 
film.  I am very glad to have seen CRASH but I can't say I enjoyed  
watching it.  I left the cinema feeling quite brutalized by what I had
seen and it was not a pleasant experience.  I hate to be so negative about
films that I review and I would feel very guilty if this review puts people 
off checking the film out for themselves.  So I would urge people who are 
considering going to see CRASH to go along, and see what you make of it !
Review written on Friday 6 June 1997
E-mail: vince@deehan.demon.co.uk
http:\\www.deehan.demon.co.uk

Author
Jerry Saravia
The controversial "Crash" is the darkest and most twisted film to come out of
David Cronenberg in years. The film stars James Spader as a commercial
producer, James Ballard, who is married to a attractive, sexy woman, Catherine
(Deborah Kara Unger). They indulge in their own sex fantasies: James has sex
with his female assistants, and she carresses the cold surfaces of jet
airplanes with her nipples. Then James gets into a fatal car accident and kills
a passenger. The driver, Helen Remington (Holly Hunter), survives and becomes
attracted to James. They start having sex in almost any wrecked car they find.
Helen introduces James to Vaughan (Elias Koteas), the high priest of auto
wrecks who recreates famous car crashes such as James Dean's and Jayne
Mansfield's. Then they meet Gabrielle (Rosanna Arquette), a cripple who has a
huge gash on her leg resembling a vagina. James and Catherine get sucked into
this weird cult where a car crash or a video of a car crash equals sexual
pleasure.
"Crash" is not an easy film to watch nor should it be. It shouldn't be
dismissed as pornographic either since there are no gratuitous sex scenes - it
isn't erotic or thrilling, just plain twisted. My interpretation of it is that
these people need to feel pleasure in their sexual encounters and they do it by
getting into car wrecks - it feeds their drive and lust. There are really no
performances in this movie, the actors just simply react to each other with
looks and glances and sexual gestures (Hunter seems out of her element in her
less than hypnotic stares). You will not identify with any of these people or
remotely like them. So why see this movie? Because it is challenging,
stimulating and provocative. The tears in Catherine's eyes at the end of the
film indicate that this sex game may have gone too far. Like Cronenberg's
"Videodrome" and his recent "eXistenZ," it will make you feel icky, unsatisfied
and uneasy for days on end. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with comments, suggestions or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at 
jerry@movieluver.com 

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: David Cronenberg
Writer: David Cronenberg (from the novel by J.G. Ballard)
Starring: James Spader, Deborah Kara Ungar, Holly Hunter, Elias Kosteas,
Rosanna Arquette, Peter MacNeill, Yolande Julian, Cheryl Swarts, Alice
Poon
I'm not really sure what to think about "Crash."  On the surface, it's a
cold, boring, unerotic porn with name starts, a name director, and some
cool camerawork.  I mean, it left me completely bored, unsatisfied, and
generally kinda weirded out.  But then again, not every film's supposed
to leave you entertained.
"Crash" is structured to play like a porn flick, but with significantly
more plot and dialogue.  While we see several extremely taboo scenes of
weirdo sex, we also have a skimpy little plot going on (mostly towards
the beginning), and maybe just a hair of characterization.  Not to
mention the acting is generally pretty good, and we don't really see a
lot of the actors completely exposed.
But what makes it supremely different from a porn is the fact that this
is not an erotic experience.  This film does not posess the erotic
hypnotism of "Henry and June" or the just plain horniness of, say, "Deep
Throat" (not that I've seen it).  If one was to be made completely hot
by this film, it would probably mean they were also into the whole "auto
eroticism" thing.  The film leaves you cold erotically (and maybe in
many other ways), but what it does is present a group of people who live
on the edge.
The film opens up on a woman, Catherine (Deborah Kara Ungar, of "The
Game"), pressing her bare breast up against a car in a public air
hangar.  Suddenly, a man enters the frame and begins to take her from
behind (the film doesnt' show all this though, even if it is NC-17). 
The next scene has a film director, James (James Spader), having sex
with a camera woman (Alice Poon) in an office on the highly-populated
set of his movie.  The next scene has the two coming together, revealing
to us that they're husband and wife, and them sharing in one another's
escapades.  While the two are arguably freaky people, we at least know
they love to live on the edge.
Soon afterwards, James is driving down the road at night, reclessly of
course (he's reading something), when he drifts into the other lane, and
then hits another car face on.  James is not killed, but the passenger
in the other car flies into his seat (obviously dying), leaving the
driver, Helen Remington (Holly Hunter - in a porn?), also alive.  The
two go through therapy together, and when getting out, they run into
eachother again.  When James gives her a ride home, they almost get into
another accident, and immeadiately afterwards, they go to an unbusy
parking lot, and have a little quickie, as they were aroused by the
accident.
You wouldn't think there would be many people who shared this same kind
of fetish, but they run into a freaky guy named Vaughan (Elias Kosteas)
and his crutch-carrying girlfriend, Gabrielle (Rosanna Arquette), who
are also into it.  Vaughan is into living on the edge as they are, but
he takes it to another level: he loves to recreate famous car crashes. 
In one scene, he and a friend, Colin Seagrave (Peter MacNeill) recreate
James Dean's car crash without any padding or safety belts, and suffer
some concussions, but nevertheless get a rush (and the attention of the
police).  Soon, these five are all having sex with one another, be it
straight, gay, or lesbian sex.
While this is admittingly all a bit comical (the film is almost like a
black comedy), the film does do a pretty awesome portrayal of people
who's main fetish is living on the edge.  I'm sure somewhere there are
people who get aroused by car accidents, but I personally don't see a
connection between car crashes and sex.  The main connection Cronenberg
shows us that both give a definite rush.  His car crash scenes are quick
and exciting mini-masterpieces: we're at first not sure if they'll take
place, but everytime it looks like it may occur, we gasp.  Then when it
happens, we hold our breath.  The same thing happens with sex, although
not in the same fashion.  These people are merely taking it to another
level.
The only problem with the film is that it's a tad redundant.  A normal
porn lasts from an hour to an hour and a half.  This goes on for about
100 minutes, and it just seems a little too long.  The sex and car
crashes are far between one another, and the time between them are a tad
on the boring side.  There's no characterization, although it could
definitely be argued, that hey, it's a porn, and we're not here to
sympathize.  But still, they coulda cut it down a bit.
But the film is saved with its presentation, as well as some other
elements.  The atmosphere is very dark and forboding, creating a kind of
cool weird feeling.  And there are several scenes are just amazing.  One
scene has Catherine and James having sex, while she softly asks him
questions about being with a man, which sounds almost erotic the way she
says it.  A sequence involving one character's death is filled with all
the edgy disjointment that the film needs.  And the final shot is shot
perfectly, creating an image of a car crash, and a couple having sex in
front of it, despite the fact that she's wounded.
The acting is also pretty good, especially for what is almost a porn
(ousting Linda Lovelace as best actress in a porn).  While James Spader
is pretty boring (he's usually pretty intense), Deborah Kara Ungar is
amazing.  She speaks all her words in almost zombie-like hushes, and
when she's having sex, she has a blank look on her face, not showing the
viewer whether she's enjoying it or not.  In one scene, she actually
looks dead while someone is having sex with her.  Holly Hunter, who gets
extra credit just for appearing in something like this, is pretty good,
and so is Rosanna Arquette (who adds a kinda cool kinkiness to her
role).
But the film is stolen by Elias Kosteas who plays his character so
intensely that he almost upstages everyone.  He often speaks as he is
out of breath, showing a definite affinity for his way of life.  He has
a great deal of energy in several scenes, especially one scene where
he's taking photographs of a picture, and a later scene where he's
getting a freaky tatoo.  He and Spader share sexual chemistry in several
scenes, foreshadowing a later scene.  Kosteas is a little known actor
(his biggest role was Casey Jones in "Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles"),
but here he shows a DeNiro-like presence, hinting that he's capable of
bigger roles.
While I hardly enjoyed "Crash," it's still a pretty intriguing portrayal
of a group of people who, if the exist, are some of the strangest and
most bizarre people in the world.  These people are able to share a rush
between two completely different entities, and the film, which doesn't
exactly pain them in a negative light, is sucessful in bringing them to
light, even if it leaves the viewer unnerved and generally freaked out. 
Despite the hardcore nature of the film and the subsequent NC-17 rating
(there's also an R-rated version, but I wouldn't even go near that
thing), anyone looking for a quick turn-on should just rent a regular
porno.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Andrew Hicks
        The realm of soft-core porn has officially run out of 
premises to tie together its mismatched sex scenes. Hence CRASH, 
a film where the generic sex scenes revolve around car crashes, 
which turn us all on in our own way. Of course. CRASH caused a 
big controversy at the Cannes film festival last year with its show of 
fetish in such violence circumstances; even Ted Turner was appalled 
and he's married to Barbarella, for God's sake!
        The movie begins with a woman (Deborah Kara Unger) 
pressing her breast against a small aircraft. A man takes her from 
behind. Cut to a Hollywood camera room. A man (James Spader) is 
pounding into a pretty Asian camerawoman. Cut to later that night. 
We find out Unger and Spader are married, and enjoy the thrill of 
swapping, public sex and the like. They provide Brief Sex Scene #3 
on the balcony, as they stare down at the highway traffic.
        Here's where CRASH starts to deviate from anything else 
you can see on Cinemax after midnight on Fridays. Spader is 
driving on the highway, happy as you please, when he steers into 
the opposite on-ramp and hits an oncoming car head-on. The other 
driver sails through the windshield and into Spader's passenger seat, 
which in a football game would earn you three points. He's dead, of 
course, but Spader and the man's wife (Holly Hunter) survive the 
crash and go through recovery in the hospital.
        After the requisite "erotic sponge bath" scene, Spader 
and Hunter are released from hospital, Spader with the irrepressible 
urge to get back behind the wheel. He gives Hunter a ride to the 
airport, during which a car crash is narrowly averted. It makes them 
horny like the dickens, though, so those two have sex in the front 
seat, which is indeed included in the deluxe options package. Then 
comes the exciting Spader-Hunter first date, a trip to an 
underground car show in which a man (Elias Koteas) and his 
cohorts reenact the fatal crash of James Dean.
        Yes, Koteas is down with the car-sex fetish and finds two 
willing friends in Spader and Hunter, who join him, his leather-clad 
girlfriend (Rosanna Arquette) and a couple other people to 
masturbate to crash test videos. No kidding. The material in 
CRASH is utterly hilarious because it's all taken so seriously. 
Writer / producer / director David Cronenberg would have us believe 
that this car crash sex stuff is perfect dramatic material for the 
masses. Played as a parody of soft-core sex flicks, CRASH would 
have been great. Played straight, it's almost unbearable. Keep these 
people away from monster truck shows.
        Rated NC-17 for man / woman sex, woman / woman sex, 
man / man sex, woman / aircraft sex, man / tailpipe sex, woman / 
parking brake sex, man / car cigarette lighter sex and woman / 
woman / strap-on-rearview-mirror sex.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Almost 1/25th of a Century!

Author
Michael Dequina
In recent years, the buzzwords "bold" and "controversial" have come
less to describe something truly daring than to serve as marketing labels
for unimaginative sleaze (Showgirls or Striptease, anyone?).  On the other
hand, David Cronenberg's Crash, which is finally opening stateside after
causing an uproar across the globe (Great Britain just recently lifted a ban
on the film), is a film that truly earns the "bold" description--it's a
brave, gutsy bit of filmmaking that is never less than fascinating.
This adaptation of J.G. Ballard's controversial novel about sex and
car crashes focuses on just that--sex and car crashes.  James and Catherine
Ballard (James Spader and Deborah Kara Unger) are marrieds who can only seem
to become aroused for each other through consensual extramarital dalliances.
After James has a head-on car collision with one Dr. Helen Remington (Holly
Hunter), killing her husband, he finds a new, exciting fetish.  James and
eventually Catherine are drawn into an underground cult of car-crash
fetishists led by Vaughan (Elias Koteas), a heavily scarred performance
artist who gets off on recreating famous celebrity car wrecks.
Not a lot of plot (there's just about as much dialogue as well), but
there is plenty of explicit sex and carnage, and I can see why so many
people absolutely abhor the film.  The film's unflinching scenes of sex
involving scarred flesh, wounds, scabs, blood, and pain are hard to take and
often shocking--perhaps beyond most people's tolerance levels.  At the
showing I attended, about 1/4 of the audience was no longer there by the
time the closing credits began to crawl.  In fact, one could hear the
auditorium doors swing open during or after each shock scene (read: sex
scene), which was just about every five minutes.
While I was often shocked, I was more fascinated then repelled.  The
thin plot and wall-to-wall sex may sound like the characteristics of a porno
movie, but the execution is not pornographic at all.  The sex scenes are raw
and unglossy, matter-of-fact and totally devoid of romanticism and eroticism
or any feeling at all.  To say that these people "have sex" may be too
pretty a term; they fuck, plain and simple.  And if using that term just
makes it sound like the film has no point, there is one.  James and
Catherine are not just unmoved by each other, but by life in general; their
inability to feel anything makes them, in particular James, seek out a way
to feel.  The film vividly shows how James attempts to feel something
through sexual encounters that grow progressively more dangerous, leading up
to the final dialogue exchange, which, the way I read it, implies the
ultimate point of the film--a haunting conclusion and realization that is
even more unsettling in how it makes logical sense.
The stark, cold elegance in how it all comes together is a tribute
to Cronenberg, whose talent to get under filmgoers' skin is further proven
by the wildly polarized, love-it-or-hate-it reaction to the film.  Despite
the preposterousness of the central idea (I doubt anyone has a car crash
fetish), there are no laughable moments, except perhaps one where the group
is driven to heights of ecstasy while watching crash test dummy footage.
Cronenberg elicits appopriately stoic and morose turns by Spader, Unger, and
Hunter, but the standouts of the cast are the creepy Koteas and Rosanna
Arquette, who plays a crippled crash victim whose leg-braces-and-leather
get-up suggests a twisted (literally) dominatrix.  Cronenberg does fall
somewhat short in setting up the characters; we never get a concrete sense
of how or why Helen, James, or Catherine became so disaffected by the world.
A better understanding of the people may have made the film resonate even
stronger.
 But, as it stands, Crash resonates pretty strongly.  With this,
what you see is not what you get.  All of the sex makes it look like porn,
but no porn film has such strong thematic subtext.  Then again, not that
many films, period, provide so much fascinating food for thought.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  mj23@the18thhole.com
Visit Mr. Brown's Movie Site at http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/
Personal Page: http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/home.html

Author
Marty Mapes
** (out of 4) The opening titles of CRASH are very interesting
(probably the best since SEVEN). Mysterious, haunting music plays while
crisp chrome names come slowly flying from the darkness. There is a
light, somewhere in the background, but its source is vague. Its source
is not as important as its effect on the chrome and interaction with the
darkness. Soon, some of the letters start turning up damaged. The chrome
is still polished, smooth, and sexy, but the underlying metal has been
stressed.
The mood of the sequence invites intimacy and asks to draw you into the
space behind the screen. At first, there's no reason not to give in, but
the damaged letters, replated in chrome imply some sort of darkness and
deception waiting beyond.
CRASH explores the connection between people and their cars in terms of
sexuality. In one sense, a person's car is an extension of their body,
and CRASH asks, with this in mind, what are the mechanics of sex? Not
reproduction, but sex. The only answer -- the only way two cars can
really interact -- is to crash. Simple enough. Some of the characters do
seem to be turned on by cars crashing, as if each bump were a nudge from
an agreeable pelvis. Some of the characters even tattoo themselves with
hood ornaments.
But there's more. CRASH also treats people as separate from their cars.
Crashes and sex are linked -- not interchangeable -- and crashes can
result in damage to the real human body. This introduces another
dimension of sexuality to the car crash. If car crashes can be sexual,
then the resulting damage to the human body can be a fascinating,
arousing secretion of this "sex." All of these ideas can be fascinating
and arousing, not to a strange literally metaphoric car-person, but to
real humans aroused by the whole subject, the movie seems to say.
The connection between cars, crashes, bodies, and sex is subtle, at
least in the real world. Cronenberg does explore the connection, but
more as a theme than as a metaphor. Perhaps "fetish" is a better word
because a fetish is a nonsexual object of sexual desire. Yet even this
is too literal a connection for CRASH. The connection in CRASH
encompasses all of these elements.
There is a scene in which the connection works particularly well. Three
characters are in a convertible, two, Vaughan and Catherine (played by
Elias Koteas and Deborah Unger) in the back seat. The car is taken to a
car wash because there is some blood on it. As the top of the car goes
up, the top on the woman comes down and the couple in the back seat
start making out. The car is now a closed dark intimate place making a
slow journey through a steamy soapy dark passage. The scene is paced
very slowly and each new phase of the car wash brings a new strange
rhythmic sound from the brushes hitting the car. The surround sound
places you (in your own dark theater) into the cramped cozy cockpit of
the black '64 Lincoln, and you can carry the metaphor one more step if
you like.
There are other spots where the connection is more of a stretch. For
Vaughan, car crashes are arousing and recreating famous car crashes is
like having sex with his favorite stars and starlets. The crash is a
substitute for sex. The attraction is never explained and the connection
is not inherently obvious, but Cronenberg handles Vaughan's fetish in
the same tone as he handles everyone else's desires.
Another connection Cronenberg explores in CRASH is the one between
sexual orifices and wounds caused by accidents (see also VIDEODROME).
Vaughan's girlfriend Gabrielle (Rosanna Arquette) has suffered a lot of
damage to her body. She wears a body brace and has a long wound on the
back of her thigh of folded skin. This is apparently arousing to a
Mercedes salesman and to main character James Ballard (James Spader),
who eventually has his way with the thigh. In an earlier scene, James
survives a car crash, but his leg is damaged and it has to be pinned.
The steel pins penetrate through James' skin, deep into his bones, like
some cold permanent copulation. Another shot shows body damage to a
slick silver sports car. The seam between the door and fender has been
wrinkled and widened, which James runs his hand across and admires.
Let me take the opportunity to restate that while I can appreciate what
Cronenberg is attempting, it doesn't make a lot of sense to me.
However, often the tone of a dream is more important than the events
that transpire. The events could be true, but they don't make a lot of
sense under scrutiny of daylight. Being afraid or sad or angry because
of the events in a dream tells you something interesting about your
state of mind.
In that sense, CRASH is like a dream. The opening credits help to set a
dark, sad, brooding tone, and the rest of the movie follows suit. It's
almost as if the movie is asking for pity, except that it presents the
subjects, not pitiably, but enticingly, envelopingly. The movie is like
a siren whose song is not beautiful but sad and hypnotizing nonetheless.
What is true of the opening titles is true of the tone of the whole
movie. It is mysterious and intriguing and it invites you in, but there
is some odd mixture of sincerity (the damaged letters, the repulsive
connection between cars and sex) and slickness (the polishing of those
letters in fresh chrome, the sexiness and sexuality of the cast and
their cars).
In conclusion, I would have to say that CRASH is not as disturbing as it
was hyped to be, but I don't understand why someone would make this
movie. A case can be made connecting cars, crashes, bodies, and sex, but
it doesn't seem like this was a statement waiting to be made. There was
nothing wrong with CRASH; it was interesting on its own terms, but
ultimately I am left asking "okay, but so what?"
Check out more current movie reviews at
http://www.indra.com/~mmapes

Author
Justin K. Siegel
Cars are sexy. They have been sexy since they have been cars. People
have sex in cars all the time. At your average drive-in movie, the ratio
of people having intercourse in their cars to people actually watching
the movie is about 12-1 (I should know -- I did an essay on this in Gr. 7.)
Crashing cars, however, are not generally considered to be sexy. But to
the select group of perverts and sycophants who populate the world of
David Cronenberg's new film, CRASH, they are. Their leader is man named
Vaughan (Elias Koteas), who makes his living by recreating famous
car-crashes (Jayne Mansfield, James Dean). One of his "followers" is
Dr. Helen Remington (Holly Hunter), whose husband has just been killed
by James Ballard (James Spader), in a gruesome car-crash. Helen is
surprisingly indifferent about her husband's passing, and she recruits
Ballard and his beautiful wife Catherine (Debarah Karah Unger) into
Vaughan's little psycho-sexual orginization.
Rosanna Arquette plays Gabrielle, a crash victim still in leg braces,
whose vaginal leg-scars become the epitome of sexual excitement for
James. The scene in which he administers oral sex to the scars is one
of the most repulsive in recent memory. More repulsive than the boy/boy
kiss between Spader and Koteas, which sent one of my friends fleeing the room.
I've never seen a movie with this many sex-scenes that was less sexually
exciting (even SHOWGIRLS). CRASH seemed like it was just one
interesting-to-watch, ten-minute sex-scene after another, but it was shot
in a fashion that did its best not to be, um, _uplifting_.
If you are an intelligent human being looking for 100 intriguing,
disturbing minutes, I would highly reccomend CRASH. On the other hand,
if you are a horny teenager hoping to worship Onan while viewing, I
suggest you look elsewhere.

Author
Jean-Denis Rouette
As our century draws to a close, human sexuality has lost much of its original 
purpose. Procreation doesn't physically need it anymore. Sexual energy beacons 
for new outlets, and sexuality itself is ripe for reinterpretation. Enter the 
car as an extension of the human body, and the car crash as a new form of 
intercourse. 
The late twentieth century notions described in CRASH are not alien to David 
Cronenberg. He explored the evolution of human sexuality through technological 
means as early as in his 1969 film STEREO, and has continued to probe with 
films like SCANNERS (1980) and VIDEODROME (1983). Ballard's book is as 
"Cronenbergian" as anything written by the director. Its imagery of twisted 
metal merging with wounded flesh, of engine oil flowing with human semen, 
begged to be captured by Cronenberg's camera. Although the director dismissed 
the novel as "repulsive" at first glance, he later spontaneously decided to 
adapt it to film. His approach, however, betrays a certain uncertainty as to 
how to expand on Ballard's ideas. Unlike the imaginative narrative structure 
he imposed on Burrough's NAKED LUNCH, his CRASH adds almost nothing to what 
was published almost three decades ago.
CRASH does not tell a story. It is very little concerned with its individual 
characters. It describes the world the characters inhabit, and they are merely 
the details of this description. The actors are made to walk through each 
scene, whispering dialogue, in a state described as "narcotized". If 
Cronenberg's strategy of casting gifted actors like Holly Hunter in such 
hollow, unrewarding roles to best communicate the emptiness and alienation of 
his world makes a certain intellectual sense, it also betrays a cynicism and 
moral stance he often denies when talking about the film. If the futuristic 
psychology hinted at in CRASH is undeniably fascinating, it needs more 
development. More thought. As it stands, our glimpse into this world is 
superficial and monotonous. Cronenberg overrates his sex scenes as 
illustrative devices. The idea of defining the characters through their 
physical relationships has merit, but the execution is too timid to work. 
Although I admire his refusal to overuse the car's many offerings of phallic 
symbolism, I question his insistence that ALL of the film's nudity be female. 
Technically, CRASH shows consummate skill and finesse. From a stunning opening 
title sequence (featuring dented metallic type) propelled by Howard Shore's 
screeching guitars, to the endless traffic viewed from Jim Balland's 
condominium balcony, to the desolate hospital halls, empty but for the 
principle players, Cronenberg knows how to communicate through film. His 
editing in the film's first half hour is concise, brutal, and brilliant. His 
"distilled" filmmaking, excluding all superfluous elements in a scene, 
creating a specific film reality, testifies to the uniqueness and solidity of 
his personal vision.
Unfortunately, once the major thematic elements have been introduced, the film 
loses its way. Scenes follow one another without advancing new ideas, and the 
repetition of theme and imagery rapidly becomes tiresome, despite the cold 
beauty of  Peter Suschitzky's photography. The more the film progresses, the 
more it seems redundant and flimsy. Entire scenes (Arquette at the car 
dealership, Hunter and Arquette making out at in the pound) go nowhere. At 
both screenings I attended, many people walked out before the final half hour. 
Cronenberg believes that the boredom many people felt watching the film stems 
from their incapacity (or unwillingness) to deal with the notions about sex 
and death that the film implies. Many of them, I suspect, had already gotten 
the point, and felt they had nothing left to gain from repetition.
By the time the film comes full circle, and sums itself up in its final shot, 
I felt that, contrary to most of Cronenberg's work, CRASH was form over 
content. The director has evolved to such an admirable level of artistic 
skill, that it is particularly disappointing that the distilled images of 
CRASH don't yield more thematic meat.

Author
Scott Renshaw
(Fine Line)
Starring:  James Spader, Holly Hunter, Elias Koteas, Deborah Kara Unger,
Rosanna Arquette.
Screenplay:  David Cronenberg, based on the novel by J. G. Ballard.
Producer:  David Cronenberg.
Director:  David Cronenberg.
MPAA Rating:  NC-17 (graphic sexual content, violence, profanity)
Running Time:  100 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In case you were wondering what all the consternation was about
concerning CRASH -- the film which New Line chief Ted Turner nearly
refused to release in America in a fit of moral outrage -- writer/director
David Cronenberg makes it clear in the space of a few minutes.  The first
scene finds a woman (Deborah Kara Unger) having sex with a man while bent
over the engine of a twin-prop plane; the second scene finds another man
(James Spader) having sex with another woman on the desk of his office.
In the third scene we learn that Unger and Spader are husband and wife
Catherine and James Ballard, and that they have a habit of describing
their affairs to each other in detail while having sex with each other.
     That might be considered quite enough to get some folks worked into a
lather, but, dear friends, you ain't seen nothin' yet.  CRASH is really
about what happens after James is responsible for an automobile accident
which leaves him and another driver, Dr. Helen Remington (Holly Hunter)
badly injured, and kills Dr. Remington's husband.  While in the hospital,
Helen and James are approached by Vaughan (Elias Koteas), a strange man
obsessed with car crashes.  Vaughan draws Helen and James into his unique
world, which includes re-creating celebrity car crashes for spectators and
keeping scrapbooks of accident scenes and injuries.  This obsession takes
on a sexual dimension as well, as confrontations with mortality turn into
expressions of primal appetites.
     I am sure that there are plenty of people who would find plenty of
things inherently repugnant about CRASH, including the fundamental
sex-violence link and the fifteen individual scenes involving some kind of
sexual behavior between the main characters in every possible form and
gender permutation.  CRASH involves some unpleasant subject matter, but I
certainly don't think it is evil.  There are plenty of dark corners of the
human psyche -- many of them dealing with sex -- and CRASH explores how
people might respond to the adrenaline rush of a brush with death in a
world where they ordinarily feel deadened, dehumanized and disconnected.
The fetishizing of destruction into a sexual act is part of a progression
for these characters; they are like addicts searching for a new high when
the old one is no longer enough to make them feel anything.
     It's challenging stuff Cronenberg is serving up, but the reason CRASH
ultimately doesn't work has nothing to do with the fact that it's
challenging.  If a film-maker is going to take a chance on creating a
world this alien, he has to give his audience someone with whom to
identify, someone to be their surrogate and tour guide.  That person
should be James, but it's not.  James is a producer of soft-core porn
films with a propensity for kinky sex when we first meet him, making it a
relatively small step to the ghoulish carnality offered to him by Vaughan
(played with creditable faux-DeNiro menace by Elias Koteas).  The
seductiveness of the crash cult needs to make sense to those of us who
don't get off narrating our affairs to our wives, and Cronenberg doesn't
make that happen.  There is the briefest glimpse of an outsider's-eye-view
when a car salesman assists James and another crash victim (Rosanna
Arquette) in an erotic bit of showroom shopping, just enough to make you
wish someone like that salesman had been for the previous hour. The
relatively static nature of James' character also makes it evident that 
for all its excesses, CRASH lacks drama, a force pushing it towards some
kind of revelation or resolution.  Spader's performance as James is flat
and detached throughout, and we need to have some understanding of his
response to Vaughan's ever-more-extreme behavior; every development seems
to strike him with the exact same mild confusion.
     Some of Cronenberg's scenes are superbly crafted, effective and
unsettling -- a tryst while going through a car wash is accompanied by
overwhelming sounds of machinery, and one scene after a crash turns
smoke from the wreckage into a romanticized mist over a meadow. 
Occasionally CRASH manages to be erotic, but far more often it is
wearying, running sex scenes at you in waves and turning every available
moment into an excuse for a grabbed crotch or a frantic
menage-a-fill-in-the-blank.  It was a mistake for Ted Turner to equate
CRASH with pornography, because the average porno film probably has more
plot.  As fitfully intriguing as the psychology of CRASH may be, it's
never engrossing.  By failing to give his audience a sense of complicity,
he has made them merely spectators at a rather monotonous freak show.

Author
James Brundage
Watching Crash, the recurring thought that popped into my mind was `Damn, I
wonder how these people afford auto insurance.'  I mean, here we have a
movie about people screwing like rabbits while at the same time crashing
cars left and right.  And, although Crash's really made of a lot tougher
stuff than the two of those, they constitute such a large amount of the plot
and curious draw of this safe haven of sadomasochism that the producers used
the quote `sex and car crashes' (ironically, from a review that blasts the
film) to advertise their celluloid psychosexual psychosis.  Leave it to me
to be thinking of auto insurance rates, when a sexy actresses like Deborah
Kara Unger is going at it onscreen.
Crash is the story of James Ballard (James Spader, picking his most
interesting (and perverse) role since Sex, Lies, and Videotape)), a man who
is living in a marriage with a primal curse: his wife, Catherine (Deborah
Kara Unger), cannot reach orgasm.  She loves sex  her habits are downright
nymphomaniacle and the marriage is open-ended  but nothing she can do can
make her reach orgasm.  Her husband makes this both his personal quest and
problem the two wonder constantly about each other's sexual partners, go at
it at least twice a day, and often have sex at the office.  Yet nothing's
quite doing it for Cathy.  She's just not getting her big O.
One day, while driving home from working on a car crash safety commercial,
Ballard has a head-on-collision with Dr. Helen Remmington (Holly Hunter).
Remmington's husband dies, flying through the windshield, and the last thing
Ballard witnesses before he passes out is Remmington ripping open her shirt
and proceeding to begin enjoying herself in the car.
Once out of rehab for the accident, Ballard meets Vaughn (Elias Koteas,
acting just as creepy as he did in Exotica): a man obsessed with the sexual
aspect of the car crash.  Vaughn lives in his car and re-enacts famous auto
accidents for a living, starting us off with an absolutely riveting
performance of James Dean's fatal car crash.  Played with a charismatic
schizophrenia reminiscent of Tyler Durden, Vaughn's the type of person
leading a quieter revolution towards `the recreation of man in a mechanical
form' a world in which the lines between male and female, as well as those
between humanoid and machine, are blurred.  The DOT doesn't like this all
too much, but this openly sexual underground goes far beyond them in staying
hidden.
Most of the rest of the movie is spent developing a love triangle between
Vaughn and Ballard and Catherine yep: get ready for a little good old
homoeroticism or get out.  One particular scene that will cause the
religious right to freak is when Unger vividly describes the taste of semen
to excite Ballard.
One of the few films that could work for both a trechcoat-wearing
theatergoer and a highbrow intellectual at the same time, Crash manages to
simultaneously ask the questions `What makes for a normal relationship?' and
`Have you gotten off yet?' and not, well, crash in the middle.  Yet when it
reaches the end we have solved nothing, proved nothing.  No character
progress has been made, and Cathy still has her little problem.  If I were
less tired and more patient, I might rewatch Crash to try to figure out what
the hell is going on here, but it's late, and I'm ready to simply say what
just about everyone else says when they're done watching Crash: `Boy, that
was one really fucked up movie.'
Short Stuff short film review:
http://www.othercinema.com/~jbrundage/

Author
Fernando Vallejo
    Starring James Spader, Holly Hunter, Elias Koteas, Deborah Kara-Unger,
Rosanna Arquette. Produced, written and directed by David Cronenberg. Running
Time: 110 mins. Rated NC-17.
 ______________________________________________________
   Few movies transcend high expectations and cross the line between a movie
and
an experience. In 1996, "Breaking the Waves" and "Fargo" rose above any other
features and became experiences. David Cronenberg's "Crash" outstrips any
genre formality and ascends into an unforgettable decaying of urban
civilization that only dreams or nightmares can match its jolts. You may or
may not like it, but it is a complete vision.
    "Crash" has a poetic, nihilistic rythm in its car wrecks and crashes and
it automatically transforms into the rudimentary theme that technology is more
and more dictating on the fate of our lives and the destiny of mankind. The
sadomasochistic pleasure generated by the characters' obsessions with ruptured
metal is the disguise used by Cronenberg this time, who really accomplishes
his most important work to date.
     Based on J.G Ballard's 1973 novel,  "Crash"  tells the incommode life of
director James Ballard ( James Spader ) after a horrible car crash, which
kills th husband of Dr. Helen Remington ( Holly Hunter ). The two wind up in
the same hospital and puzzingly become erotically charged by an unexplainable
attraction that's linking them: the car crash. Soon, they have sex in cars,
are turned on by crash dummies footage and their sexual force is so colossal
they plant their on car wrecks. Joining them in this almost surreal journey is
Cronenberg's most memorable character to date, Vaughan ( Elias Koteas ) who
worships all sorts of bloody crashes and the re-shaping of the human body
through wounds and scars. He even keeps a portfolio with gruesome pictures of
devastated people right after accidents. Gradually, Ballard and his wife
Catherine ( Deborah Kara Unger )  become involved in this disproportionate
world of pleasure, domination and survival. 
    Cronenberg's past work consisted of artsy-fartsy duds which were coated by
hisscience-fictional, unexquisite grotesqueries , but in "Crash" Cronenberg
concocts a revolutionary modification of the concept man vs technology, in a
deadly collision course that demonstrates the evolution of an artist when
presented with a pragmatic theory about the future. He has cleverly fumigated
these characters from social exposition and confronting our senses with a
group of people and not an entire society, because in a morbid manner, they
are representing th aberration of our world which will not be the same, no
matter what. The honesty of the protagonists is not a facade of vague
personification but a crude reality of how to understand the future ahead of
us, beacuse in "Crash" even at the most explicit, shifting sex traingles there
is no major conflict the characters are face with. The conflict is humans
approaching a new era.
    It can also be said  "Crash" contains human beings devoid of background,
personalities or opinions but just like Kubrick's "2001" and Ridley Scott's
"Blade Runner,"  "Crash" symbolizes a mechanical community in a fight with
themselves , their own progressing minds which in essence, are auto-
destructing us. Machines take over man.
     The sex is unlike any other we have recently seen, conducted mostly in
cars, dangerously erotic and brilliantly executed, devoid of any feelings, and
there is no moment in "Crash" where the sex is juxtapositioned away from the
unexplained phenomenon of getting turned on by metal.  When James and Helen
forst glance at each other after the deadly accident, it marks the beginning
of a civilized, urban post apocalyptic phantasmagoria vitalized by  adrenaline
rushing moments.  
   The people are brave to face their wicked temptations which at first, seem
unexplicable, and when Vaughan is introduced their pleasure is given another
cryptic element :can technology change the shape of humans ? can technology
abolish the evolution of men ?. Vaughan is a man with ideas and they are all
experiencing this vacuum of studies and  questions with a desire to sexually
benefit from these arguments as well as exploring new scientific grounds.
    Disguising a universal theme with crude sex is not only appropiate, it is
necessary. "Crash" unabashedly emphasizes that relationships, love and
cherishing for other human beings are missing in today's microchip age, and
again drawing a comparison to "Blade Runner" its proclaiming a bleak, lifeless
unfolding world ahead of us. "Crash" is set in the present, it doesn't rely on
astonishing sets, art direction or extravagant effects, its heart lies on the
thematic components, the direction, the coldness and the coldness of the
actors.
     The ensemble cast is excellent , Spader, whose expresionless face is
letter-perfect for the character and adds to the gloomy tone , but Elias
Koteas is deliciously malignant as the morbid Vaughan . You may remeber him
from " Exotica " , but his prescence here adds an eccentric effect, as if this
sick man is really onto something.
     J. G Ballard wrote "Crash"  in the early 70's , but twenty four years
later it is the quintissential " controversy " movie. Division towards the
film will certainly have very wide divisions: either one is captivated or is
tremendously aggravated. Ted Turner, President of Fine Line Pictures has
criticised "Crash" for being preposterous, as well as some top critics. The
combo of flesh and metal may have gotten to them, but with sumptous orgasm-
fests it was deservedly rewarded an NC-17 rating. I suppose these people were
turned off by the constant sadomasochism.
     Time is the only response as to wether "Crash" will rank among "
Metropolis", "Runner" and "A Clockwork Orange" in their dedication to express
the deterioration of mankind. It relentelssly out-smarts a ridiculous road it
could have taken, and by amplifying a fragment of a concept, the destruction
that lies ahead of us. Thanks to J.G Ballard , David Cronenberg has finally
given us a dazzling piece of filmmaking to discuss and share our opinions.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Rated NC-17, One and one half out of five stars.
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
For more reviews, go to www.nuvo-online.com and click on "film."
A Nordic blonde glances repeatedly into her rear-view mirror. She sees 
her husband following closely. Suddenly, he accelerates and taps her car 
with his. He pulls back, then hits her car again, harder. When he rams 
her car a third time, she veers wildly; barely maintaining control of her 
vehicle. Is this scene depicting an attempt at murder? No. In David 
Cronenberg's "Crash," this is foreplay.
Based on J.G. Ballard's 1973 novel, "Crash" is about a group of people 
who are sexually aroused by car wrecks. The highly controversial NC-17 
film won a special jury prize at the Cannes Film Festival, for 
"originality, daring and audacity." Ted Turner, owner of Fine Line, the 
company distributing the film, has been quite vocal about his utter 
disgust with the movie. Nationally, General Cinema has refused to run 
"Crash" in any of their theaters.
All this fuss is intriguing, of course, and may tempt you to check out 
the film. Don't. To put it as succinctly as possible, "Crash" is 
pretentious crap. David Cronenberg has been cranking out similar creep 
shows for years. He specializes in nightmare visions of sex merged with 
technology, heavily spiced with close ups of wounds and surgical 
instruments. Occassionally he hits pay dirt. His remake of "The Fly" was 
a spellbinding mixture of horror and romance. But more often, as with 
"Videodrome" and "Dead Ringers," Cronenberg simply produces trumped-up, 
pseudo-intellectual versions of the kind of Grade Z gore-fests that 
littered drive-ins back in the 60's. 
As for the plot, "Crash" barely has one. James Spader loses control of 
his car and hits another vehicle head-on, killing the other driver and 
leaving the driver's wife (Holly Hunter) seriously injured. While 
hospitalized, Spader meets Hunter's "friend" Vaughn (Elias Koteas,) a 
grotesquely-scarred performance artist who stages reenactments of famous 
celebrity crashes. Spader and wife Deborah Unger (the kind of ice queen 
that frequently popped up in Hitchcock films) quickly become members of 
Vaughn's car-sex cult. Then everyone in the cast  wrecks cars and screws 
each other for an hour and a half. The end.
There's a lot of sex in "Crash" and most of it is repellent. The most 
disgusting moment (and there are so many to choose from) comes when 
Spader hooks up with Rosanna Arquette, a horribly mutilated cult member 
bedecked with leg braces and lots of leather, and has sex with her 
scarred-over wound.
Vaughn is the erotic center of the group. The cultists dote on his 
mangled body and listen intently to his whispered babble. "Crashes mingle 
the sexual energy of the dead with the living," Vaughn murmurs, "creating 
an intensity that sets the latter apart from, for lack of a better 
description, safer drivers." Early on, he tells Spader he's involved in 
"the reshaping of the human body by modern technology." Later, he 
confesses that his statement was "just a test," to see if Spader was 
ready for the *really* heavy stuff. Eventually, everyone in the cast has 
sex with Vaughn. After all, who could resist a guy like that?
"Crash" has a slow, deliberately mechanical feel. The emotionally stunted 
characters show no despair over the death of one of their own, merely 
regretting that they didn't get to watch. They rarely make eye contact 
during sex. They rarely even act like people; it's as if they are all 
various aspects of one terribly sad personality.
The consensus of opinion is that "Crash" is a cautionary tale, suggesting 
that our culture has grown so jaded that we must go to sick extremes to 
reach any vague semblance of satisfaction. Supposedly, Cronenberg has 
used these offensive images to force the viewer into examining the nature 
of sexual obsession, without being distracted by anything genuinely 
erotic. I doubt it. David Cronenberg has used these images repeatedly 
throughout his career for a reason. I suspect that he gets off on this 
stuff, that these images of wounds, surgical instruments and the like 
reflect what turns him on. I suspect "Crash" has no message, that 
Cronenberg is simply pulling pictures from some dark corner of his soul 
and putting them on film because he can. But you don't have to watch him 
do it. 

Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring James Spader; Holly Hunter; Elias Koteas; Deborah Unger & Rosanna
Arquette
Strange, disturbing, and weird are all words that would make apt
descriptions of Crash. Simply put, Crash is a movie about people who become
sexually aroused over car crashes. Both being a participant in them, and
even viewing such carnage is a turn on. James Spader stars as a man who has
a very open relationship with his wife (Deborah Kara Unger). They share
stories of their extra marital sexual exploits with each other as a way of
turning the other on. Nice. Anyway, good old James Spader is driving down
the highway and loses control of his car, running into a car carrying Holly
Hunter and her husband. The result sends Hunter and Spader's characters to
the hospital and the husband to the graveyard. Both Hunter and Spader suffer
crippling injuries but one thing leads to another and they end up meeting
and having sex in the back of a car. Sure, makes sense to me. Every woman
would just rush right out and do the nasty with the guy that just killed her
husband. I might add that this is the point were the movie completely lost
me. Hunter draws Spader into a world populated by weirdoes who get off on
watching car wrecks and who seem to enjoy the pain associated with these car
crashes. Especially if the injuries sustained are permanent. Spader brings
wifey along for the ride too, and it just keeps getting stranger and
stranger. The only way to sum up the plot of this movie is that most people
will want to stop watching it before the halfway point. Those that actually
make it through the whole movie will be left shaking their heads.
The acting is, I guess, what you would call decent. To be honest, the whole
thing is just so weird it was really hard to tell. One standout in this
otherwise cave of weirdness is Deborah Kara Unger, who purrs her way through
her dialogue. While Unger may not qualify as drop dead gorgeous, she
certainly has the exotic good looks to cause a traffic accident. (Sorry, bad
joke.) In all seriousness, she was, at least for this male reviewer, the
high point of the movie. Which compared to the rest of this film, isn't
exactly a big feat.
Crash is not for the easily offended. Actually, Crash might even offend the
not so easily offended. At the very least, it will leave you scratching your
head. Not so much at the fact that people would get sexual gratification at
a car crash. We all know that the world is filled with weirdoes. What you
will be left scratching your head over is the fact that somebody would
actually make a movie about this subject matter. Director David Cronenberg
leaves little doubt in my mind that he is now the undisputed king of strange
movies. Here's a piece of advice Dave. I think it's time for you to change
careers. Hopefully your new one will keep you far away from movies -- making
theaters a lot safer for everyone.

Author
Dennis Schwartz

CRASH (director/writer: David Cronenberg; screenwriter: from a J.G.
Ballard novel; cinematographer: Peter Suschitzky; editor: Ron Sanders;
cast: James Spader (James Ballard), Deborah Kara Unger (Catherine
Ballard), Holly Hunter (Helen Remington), Elias Koteas (Vaughan),
Rosanna Arquette (Gabrielle), Peter MacNeill (Colin Seagrave), Yolanda
Julian (Airplane Hooker), Cheryl Swarts (Vera Seagrave), 1996-Can.)
This most uncompromising film is based on the Britisher J.G. Ballard's
1973 novel Crash. The theme is about sex, death, and technology. But
what this Canadian film is trying to say about those subjects, is
anyone's guess. My guess, after seeing this film three times, is that it
is not trying to say anything that is revelational, but it takes a car
crash -- something no one in their right mind can revel in and think
they are sexually getting off on -- and depicts a sexual fetish cult
that finds a car crash to be as stimulating as a sexual act. It is a
film probing how strange the mind is, especially in this post-nuclear
age; and, how sex is created in the mind, and how sexual fetishes are no
stranger than anything else conceived there.
In lieu, of a regular storyline, the film consists of a series of
obsessive scenes regarding car crashes and of having sex in a car. It is
the kind of film that one will either love or hate.  One thing can be
said with a certain amount of reassurance, the film is a faithful
adaptation of the book, even keeping the monotonous mood of the book's
repetetive themes played out over and over again. At the 1996 Cannes
Film Festival, where it got mixed reviews of boos and cheers from the
crowd, it nevertheless received a special jury prize for "originality."
The film has something to say that comes in the form of a veiled warning
about the future of technology and the potential deepening
psychopathology that is needed for a more benevolent humanity. It has
caused ripples of controversy, not because of any theme it might have,
but because of the sex scenes in the cars, its crossing of old moral
boundaries in favor of pornography, and the way the film unfolds without
a visible story. Its naysayers said, it would encourage viewers to have
sex while driving in their car, thereby causing accidents. Ted Turner,
who owns the rights to distribute the film through his ownership of Fine
Line, said he hated it. All I could say to those arguments  --  is
horsefeathers! If that's a legitimate reason to ban or knock a film, you
might as well censor almost every film made as presenting some danger or
another.
In the modern skyscraper city of Toronto, James Ballard (James Spader)
produces TV commercials while his wife Catherine (Deborah Unger) either
works at the airport or just likes to hang out there. Their marriage is
an open one, with each exploring sex in novel ways with other partners
and with them then acting out what they did with their other partners.
While James has sex with a member of his film crew during a break, his
wife draws herself listlessly over the nose of a plane parked in an
empty hangar and strips to her bra while rubbing her breasts against the
plane. From behind her, an unknown seducer kisses her thighs and mounts
her backside while she writhes her body against the glacial metal of the
plane.
James is not fully alert after his busy workday when driving home to his
high-rise apartment on the slick highway road. When he bends down to
retrieve some papers, he loses control of the car and it goes over the
white dividing line as he spins out of control and collides head-on with
a car going in the opposite direction. While the driver of the other car
goes through the windshield and dies instantly, the passenger, Dr Helen
Remington (Holly Hunter), survives along with James. They both receive
injuries and are taken to the hospital. James has his leg pinned
together by metal rods and walks with a limp. When in the corridor,
someone who appears to be a doctor but isn't, Vaughan (Elias Koteas),
starts to examine James in detail and in particular checking out the
scars on his body. James willingly submits to this examination without
checking for credentials or even asking him who he is, even though the
examination was a highly suspicious one. James acts as if he is a zombie
with a perpetual hard-on for women, scarred men, and cars crashes.
Going back to the junkyard to look at his crashed car, James meets
Helen, who has also come to look for her car. The two get together and
find that they have much in common due to the crash. They get along so
well, that James says he will drop her off at the airport, where she
works as a doctor for immigrants. He is driving his new car, which is
the same model car he crashed. They both complain about the increase in
traffic since their accident, when suddenly James loses control of the
car and it hits the railing on the highway. This near-accident seems to
sexually excite them, so they stop at the airport garage and have wild
sex in his car.
One evening, James, Helen, and Catherine attend, what can only be
described as a show that has an unusual theme, even for performance
theater. Vaughan, it turns out, is a car crash freak and scarred
survivor of many car crashes. He has restaged the 1955 car crash of
James Dean down to the exact details for his act. Colin Seagrave (Peter
MacNeill), a professional stunt driver, acts as James Dean, while
Vaughan acts as his German mechanic who accompanied him to an auto race
in Salinas, California, on that fatal September 30th date. They will be
driving the exact replica of the Porsche sports car with the number 130
on it that Dean drove when he broke his neck, as they simulate the crash
with the college student, being acted by another stunt driver, who is
driving the other car that he crashed into.
After the show abruptly ends because traffic cops rush the set, James,
Catherine and Helen join with Vaughan and Seagrave, who got a concussion
from the crash, in the nerve center that they operate together out of
Seagrave's house. Gabrielle (Rosanna Arquette) is the companion of
Vaughan, wearing leg braces and a full-body black leather suit for
support. Vera (Swarts) is the loving wife of Seagrave, helping him
prepare next for the Jayne Mansfield accident he is anxious to stage.
When Vaughan is asked by James, what he's about! he replies: "I'm
intimately involved in reshaping the human body by modern
technology."The group then watches some video tapes of car crashes and
masturbate to it, while sitting on a couch. Hey, I've got no problems
with them so far, but it seems more funny than it is serious...though
there is something intangible about the emptiness of this film and its
unwillingness to deliver any expected messages or cater to the masses
demand to be entertained, that makes this film intriguing in a very
special way.
If the film disturbed or was meant to disturb, I can't really say that
it disturbed me. It's a speculative work, like a test project, trying to
see what it can come up with that works. That there is such a thing as
someone having a car crash sex fetish like those in the film, seems
unlikely. But that doesn't seem to matter. What matters is that this
film is looking for something to say about the modern world and the new
kind of strangeness it has developed.
The film seems to be like a research scientist probing clinically for
answers he is not sure of, by asking questions he is not sure of, only
he is trying to solve a problem that he is sure exists. That everyone is
dehumanized in this film, might be the point of it. The acting, for what
the actors were asked to do-- that is, all act in an emotionless fashion
except for the bizarre portrayal by Koteas, is accomplished rather
successfully. Spader and Unger are a beautiful couple, pushing the
sexual envelope in their intimate but cold relationship. Both have
accepted their imminent death as a way of life and are comfortable with
their peculiar relationship. Their thrills come from breaking through
sexual taboos and knowing they care about each other even if they appear
to be distant. Hunter is like them- dehumanized to a certain point, she
seems to be interested in her own sexual self-satisfaction above
anything else, and her near-death experience seems to have reinforced
that need. Koteas is a freak who yearns only for liberating himself
sexually through the near-death experience of a car crash. He loves so
much what he is doing, that it becomes infectious to others, and like
any charismatic leader, there seems to be always others who will follow
him.
For me, the story might be perceived as being more voyeuristic than
controversial. It defies having a label attached to it. Somehow, it drew
me into its audacious storytelling. I am not annoyed to be put in the
position of being a voyeur, as much as I am amazed by how all the
cultists respond to their lives. The film itself is daring because it is
different than other films, it covers ground where mainstream films dare
not go; its repetitiveness, its hermetic and absurd nature, make for a
film that I like better than how it is perceived through all the hype it
has received. I enjoyed it because it was so well-made and acted, and
strangely enough, for a film that some criticized as pornographic, I
found it to be in the best of taste. What it lacked was definition and
perception, and a sense of getting out of its own awe-inspiring way.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
 ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Bryant Frazer
"It disturbs me. People with warped minds are going to like it, though."
- Ted Turner on CRASH
Somewhere in the middle of CRASH, the remarkable new film from David
Cronenberg, James Ballard (James Spader) is caught in traffic. The cars
on the highway are at a standstill, stymied by an impact farther up the
blacktop. Ballard is driving a vintage Lincoln Continental, the kind of
convertible JFK rode through Dallas. The car belongs to Ballard's new
friend Vaughan (Elias Koteas, from EXOTICA), a visionary of sorts who
sees car crashes as "fertilizing," rather than destructive, events. In
the car with Ballard and Vaughan is Ballard's wife, Catherine (Deborah
Kara Unger), who is growing more and more attracted to Vaughan -- she
and Ballard seem to achieve sexual bliss more and more often by
comparing notes on their most recent adulteries. You could almost
consider this menage a trois a special kind of post-nuclear family.
Ballard eases the Lincoln into the breakdown lane and cruises serenely
alongside the stream of cars, finally coming across the steel and
chrome carnage itself. Vaughan's body juts up out of the Lincoln with
his beloved camera pressed to his face, flashbulb popping. It's a
spectacular crash -- at least three cars were involved. Ballard pulls
off the road entirely and the three get out of the Lincoln. Splitting
up and investigating the scene, Ballard, Vaughan and Catherine are
assimilated into the spectacle. Vaughan stalks the victims, taking
snapshots with impunity. The lovely, skeletal Catherine takes a seat
next to a woman whose facial features (we see as she turns toward the
camera) are crossed with blood and grue. Ballard watches from the
periphery as firefighters use saws and heavy-duty shears to perform
cesarean surgery on the cars and birth the bloody drivers and
passengers encased inside.
Imagine the angels from WINGS OF DESIRE investigating the highway
pile-up from Godard's WEEKEND -- that's the paranormal mood at this
crash scene. Further imagine that those angels began taking dirty
pictures of one another amid the wreckage, and you'll get a sense for
what Cronenberg has nearly accomplished. It's a movie about sexual
deviance taken to an extreme that borders on farce, a movie about the
ways human relationships are transforming in the latter years of the
20th century. It would be easy for CRASH to dissolve into high, mordant
comedy -- indeed, this is a witty movie -- but the tone is dry and
mournful throughout. These characters are truly ghosts among the
living.
CRASH is based on the 1973 novel by J.G. Ballard that used clinical,
pornographic language to describe sexual acts in the vocabulary of
automobile fetishists. Semen is smeared across instrument panels, the
marks of hood ornaments and dashboard moldings are embedded in flesh
like blistered tattoos, and orgasms are intimately related to the
thrumming of a car wash, the smell of grease and gasoline, and the
geometry of crumpled metal. The film version is, if you can believe it,
more restrained than the book. But it's an indicator of Cronenberg's
considerable skill that material like this seems at all credible on
celluloid.
CRASH was a rumored Cronenberg project for many years, even before it
became a reality. Certainly it had that sordid high-concept gloss to
it, a Cronenberg trademark: underground community of sexual deviants
gets off on car crashes. And of course it seemed to fit well with
Cronenberg's long-standing mission of investigating the transformative
power of modern technology. His first commercial feature was the
quasi-hedonistic SHIVERS (also 1973), which in its apocalyptic
treatment of venereal disease weirdly prefigured the AIDS epidemic. He
followed that up with films featuring, among other things, mutant sex
organs (RABID, 1977), mutant superpowers (SCANNERS, 1981), and mutant
cable TV (VIDEODROME, 1983). His unnerving DEAD RINGERS (1988) made
disquieting use of a gleaming, fetishistic toolkit of gynecological
instruments for operating on mutant women, and now CRASH suggests that
our obsession with ever more tortuous permutations of sexual
stimulation is itself a mutation -- or, perhaps more chillingly, an
evolution. At least in a metaphorical sense, Cronenberg's sympathies
seem, as always, to be on the side of the deviants.
The film opens with three sex scenes -- bang, bang, bang -- about which
much has been made elsewhere. But it's simply introductory material,
punctuated furiously by a crash scene in which Ballard, driving down a
highway at night trying to read a map by dome light, loses control of
his car, hops the median, and speeds through oncoming traffic for a few
harrowing moments before colliding head-on with another car.  Metal
twists and windshields shatter in real time, and Ballard -- who's
belted in -- winds up with a corpse in his passenger seat. Still
strapped into the other car is the dead man's wife, Helen (Holly
Hunter), and Ballard can only stare blankly at her as she struggles to
undo her own belt -- somehow exposing her left breast in the process.
That sort of fortuitous exhibitionism is emblematic of CRASH's unlikely
sex drive. (The boy-meets-girl premise of the screenplay would make
perfect narrative sense in a less violent context.) But after
introducing Ballard to Helen, Cronenberg orchestrates the ensuing
carnal action with a precise sense of the absurd.
The two don't make love right away, but they do convalesce in the same
hospital, which is usually reserved for airplane crash victims. When
they consummate their strange attraction, it's in the wreckage of
Ballard's car. Helen introduces Ballard to Vaughan, a scarred,
obsessive weirdo who, with a cadre of stunt drivers, recreates famous
car crashes -- the James Dean crash, the Jayne Mansfield crash -- for
small audiences at clandestine gatherings in the dead of night.
Through Vaughan, Ballard meets Gabrielle (Rosanna Arquette), a
flirtacious cripple whose leg braces resemble bondage gear.  Of all the
characters, Gabrielle is the only one who seems to have a sense of
humor -- especially in a scene of Cronenberg's invention that involves
an automobile showroom, a car salesman, Gabrielle's naked thigh, and a
delicate instance of penetration.
>From the metal pins that intrude upon the flesh of Ballard's lacerated
leg to the steering wheel imprint Vaughan has tattooed on his chest
(and the bruises he tattoos upon one of his lovers), CRASH is a science
fiction movie about the body's continued assimilation of its
environment in a motor culture. These are characters whose sexuality
pumps through the cloverleaf veins of the big city, who have deciphered
a secret code to discover a common nonverbal language that indulges,
connects and fulfills them. They feel that the Toronto traffic patterns
are getting heavier, that all the cars are gathering for some reason
they can't understand. If that sounds both trite and mysterious, it's a
neat expression of the human condition in the waning years of the
millenium, of powerlessness and disassociation in the face of the
population explosion.
Through all of this, Unger's Catherine retains a detachment even more
absolute than the occasionally bemused stare of Spader's Ballard. I
found myself wishing I had taken a closer look at all those magazines
Unger has appeared in lately, to figure out how much of what I saw
on-screen was her, and how much was CRASH's version of her. In
close-up, the contours of her face are as stark and angular as the
internal structure of a machine. She runs both hot and cold -- as a
character who removes her clothes so often that it seems like a robotic
functionality, Unger is fine and more than a little creepy.
Creepier is Koteas, whose Vaughan is sharply intelligent but
deceptively brutish. I'm a fan of his work, but I can't help but wonder
whether the script or the characterization is at fault -- I found my
attention drifting exactly twice during CRASH, both times during one of
Vaughan's very Cronenbergian monologues on the nature of crashes and
the "project" being undertaken. Perhaps Cronenberg himself could have
played the part of Vaughan, if only he cut a more imposing figure.
Spader seems completely at ease among these surroundings, which is an
indicator of Ballard's sense of alienation -- when you feel you've done
it all, it makes sense that you'd be willing to try anything.
Of all the cast, only Holly Hunter seems to make a self-conscious
effort at fitting in -- her slightly twerpy line readings only call
attention to themselves. Still, I think that everyone involved in CRASH
should get a trophy, since it's heartening to see "name" actors
fearlessly tackle risky material.
It remains to be seen, at this writing, whether CRASH will become a
flashpoint for debate in the U.S. the way it did in Great Britain,
where even the London tabloids took the film to task with headlines
blaring, "Ban This Car Crash Sex Film!" As might be expected, CRASH can
count among its critics a number of vocal blockheads -- including
studio honcho Ted Turner -- who demonstrate only their inability to
understand the concept of metaphor, or the idea that a film can
investigate deviant activity without necessarily endorsing it.
And CRASH is a rigorous investigation, though it's not everything that
it wants to be. It's a little obscure, a little repetitive, and, worse,
occasionally dull. But the experiment is so compelling, and the moments
that work so mesmerizing, that CRASH ultimately rewards the attention
you give it.
In fact, CRASH marks a fairly spectacular return to form for a
filmmaker who seemed in recent years to become bored with his own
vision. After making what may have been his closest approach to
respectability with the sufficiently brilliant DEAD RINGERS, Cronenberg
retreated into distinctive but comparably tepid adaptations of the
famous work of others -- in 1991, NAKED LUNCH's loose interpretation of
the life of William S. Burroughs and in 1993, M. BUTTERFLY's
squandering of a major studio's resources on a singular treatment of
the famous gender bender that could best be described as, well, odd.
Even though CRASH is another adaptation, Cronenberg and Ballard seem to
be pretty much on the same wavelength. He's returned to his conception
of a sort of underground elite -- the crash fetishists could be a part
of some secret society encompassing a host of refugees from Cronenberg
movies. More than anything he's done since VIDEODROME, CRASH seems to
be another crucial piece of what had once seemed to be the Cronenberg
project -- a phantasmal, cerebral meditation on the evolution of human
deviance. Since his next project is an original screenplay dealing with
virtual reality, we can only hope that his project is back on track.
The true meaning of CRASH is perhaps beyond words. It's shaped, no
doubt, by the viewer's individual reaction to its erotic set pieces. Is
it "sexy?" Well, sometimes. (Your mileage may vary.) Whether it's a
"cautionary tale" has been the subject of some debate. (Cronenberg now
says it's not.) It's certainly not meant for everyone -- in fact, most
viewers may find it either distasteful or simply ludicrous.  The final
lines of dialogue, in particular, induced not-quite-appropriate gales
of laughter at my screening. (It may be worth seeing in a nearly empty
theater for that reason.) But this is serious over-the-top filmmaking,
and the knowledge it imparts is well beyond the ken of almost anything
else that passes for commercial cinema these days.  If you're willing
to buckle up and take the ride, CRASH is a demonstration of
psychosexual decadence that LOST HIGHWAY only dreamed of, a true and
troubled film noir for the end of the millenium.


Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: James Spader, Holly Hunter, Elias Koteas, Deborah Kara Unger, 
      Rosanna Arquette
Director: David Cronenberg
Producer: David Cronenberg
Screenplay: David Cronenberg based on the novel by J.G. Ballard
Cinematography: Peter Suschitzky
Music: Howard Shore
U.S. Distributor: Fine Line Features
     It has been called brave, rousing, and shocking.  At the 1996 
Cannes Film Festival, where it received its world premiere, it was both 
hailed and booed, and received a special jury prize for "originality, 
daring, and audacity."  Ted Turner, who owns Fine Line Features, labeled 
it "really weird."  Britain's EVENING STANDARD called it "beyond the 
bounds of depravity."  Yet for all the opinions floating around about 
how ground-breaking and controversial CRASH is, I found it to be 
something of a letdown.  
     CRASH has a couple of concepts which are, admittedly, fascinating 
and original, but not a whole lot more.  The movie tries to milk these 
themes for one-hundred minutes, but basically runs out of interesting 
material in less than a third of that time.  From the half-hour point 
on, CRASH subsists on style alone.  It's a slim cinematic diet that will 
have viewers squirming in their seats long before the end credits roll.  
Despite all the naked flesh and flashy car accidents, CRASH is basically 
a bore.
     The central premise of CRASH, which writer/director/producer David 
Cronenberg (THE FLY, DEAD RINGERS) has adapted from the book by J.G. 
Ballard, deals with what VARIETY dubbed "auto-eroticism".  The film, 
like the novel, focuses on a group of people who are turned on by car 
accidents.  The more serious the crash, the more powerful the 
stimulation.  Death, danger, dismemberment, and sexuality are all 
interconnected.  Penetration, whether of flesh into flesh, metal into 
metal, or metal into flesh, leads to release, either of sexual energy, 
life, or both.  
     It's well known that for some people, a sense of danger enhances 
sex.  There are the so-called "gaspers" who like to be strangled while 
approaching orgasm.  There are those who crave sadomasochistic role-
playing.  And, as depicted here, there are those who get off on car 
crashes.  They can be participants or observers, but, in the presence of 
such raw destructive power and mayhem, they become aroused.  CRASH 
follows the exploits of five such characters -- three female and two 
male -- all of whom, at one time or another, give themselves over to 
sexual abandon as the result of an automotive disaster.
     The main character, James Ballard (James Spader), who takes his 
name from the book's author, is involved in an open marriage to 
Catherine (Deborah Kara Unger).  The two have sexual encounters with 
others, then come home and make love while telling about the 
experiences.  One day, James is involved in a head-on collision.  The 
driver of the other car is killed; his wife, Dr. Helen Remington (Holly 
Hunter), survives, but is injured.  While James is recovering in the 
hospital, he meets the mysterious Vaughan (Elias Koteas), a friend of 
Helen's with a strange fascination for accident victims.  
     Soon after his release from the hospital, James encounters Helen at 
the police impound for wrecked cars.  The two have a torrid sexual 
encounter which leads to James' initiation into an elite group of men 
and women who intertwine eroticism with crashes.  In addition to James, 
Helen, and Vaughan, there's also a woman named Gabrielle (Rosanna 
Arquette), who wears leather leg braces and metal body supports like 
badges of honor.  She is, in Vaughan's words, reshaping her body through 
the use of modern technology.  Along with James' intrigued-but-reluctant 
wife, these characters explore sexual and physical boundaries, visiting 
accident sites and re-enacting famous collisions (such as those of James 
Dean and Jayne Mansfield).  
     All of this sounds reasonably interesting, and it is, at least for 
about half an hour.  After that, CRASH becomes repetitious and tedious.  
In the wake of the initial flurry of eye-opening material, the film is 
content to re-tread the same ideas, never striking out in new directions 
or offering a different approach.  There's no plot to speak of -- just a 
series of visceral images loosely strung together to approximate a 
narrative.  More importantly and most frustratingly, there's no real 
character development.  The five main figures are ciphers and 
mouthpieces for cryptic ideas, not legitimate personalities.  We never 
connect with them on an emotional, psychological, or intellectual level.  
They're script constructs, necessary only because Cronenberg needs one 
or two-dimensional people to convey certain themes. 
     The aspect of CRASH most likely to retain a viewer's attention is 
its style.  Cronenberg, along with cinematographer Peter Suschitzky, has 
given this film a darkly original look, filled with shocking images of 
violent crashes and raw sex.  Unger, Hunter, and Arquette are called 
upon to expose just about everything, and some of the accidents, with 
their twisted metal and shattered glass, seem sickeningly real.  Often, 
watching CRASH makes you feel like a voyeur peeping through blinds or 
glancing covertly at a roadside collision.
     The three females all bring something interesting to their 
performances.  Hunter allows Helen to be uncertain of the implications 
surrounding her newly-discovered fetish, Unger mixes pathos with a 
strangely icy sensuality, and Arquette is both sexy and vulnerable in 
her metal-and-leather outfit.  The standout performance belongs to 
Canadian actor Elias Koteas (EXOTICA), who is provocative and persuasive 
as the Svengali-like leader of the group.  From an acting standpoint, 
the weak link is James Spader, who mistakenly thinks that the blandness 
he exhibited in SEX, LIES, AND VIDEOTAPE serves him well here.  His 
character is poorly developed to begin with; Spader does nothing to 
invest Ballard with any additional life.
     There are many movie-goers who will see CRASH exclusively because 
it has caused such a stir, and many more who will avoid it for the same 
reason.  However, while there is a lot of sex in the film, the NC-17 
rating seems more obligatory than necessary.  There's nothing 
exceptionally graphic or startling here.  If not for the quantity of sex 
shots and the somewhat-kinky nature, a hard R would have been equally 
appropriate.  As for CRASH's substance -- the film presents some 
provocative ideas, but, without characters or a plot to deliver them, 
they have a minimal impact. 
- James Berardinelli
e-mail: berardin@bc.cybernex.net
ReelViews web site: http://www.cybernex.net/~berardin 
